Louisiana, session 2026, HB116.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart G-2 of Part IV of Chapter 1 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 33:140.120.1, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART G-2. NORTHEAST LOUISIANA MULTIMODAL DISTRICT
§140.120.1. Northeast Louisiana Multimodal District; powers and duties
In addition to the powers granted to railroad development districts pursuant
to Subpart G of this Part, the Northeast Louisiana Multimodal District, referred to
in this Section as the "district", may exercise all powers of a political subdivision
necessary or convenient for the purpose of promoting and encouraging the
development of rail service and industrial and economic development within the
district, including but not limited to the following:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-426 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 116
(1) To enter into contracts for the purchase, acquisition, construction,
operation, maintenance, and improvement of works and facilities necessary in
connection with the purposes of the district, including contracts with a rail freight
common carrier authorized under Title 49 of the United States Code to operate over
the rail lines of the district in providing and conducting rail services for the district,
which company shall be subject to all applicable federal and state regulatory
authorities, laws, rules, and regulations governing the operations of a freight
common carrier railroad in the state of Louisiana.
(2) To exercise any power that may be exercised by an industrial
development board pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950.
(3) To exercise any power that may be exercised by an economic
development district pursuant to Part II of Chapter 27 of this Title.
(4) To create subdistricts as provided in this Paragraph. The district shall
publish notice of its intent to create a subdistrict in the official journal of the district.
Not less than ten days after publication of such notice in the official journal of the
district, the board of commissioners of the district shall conduct a public hearing on
the question of creating the subdistrict. Thereafter, the board may designate one or
more proposed areas within the boundaries of the district as a subdistrict of the
district. Each subdistrict shall constitute a political subdivision of the state and shall
be governed by the board. Each subdistrict shall have the same powers granted to
the district. Each subdistrict shall be given a suitable name as the board may
designate.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-426 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 116